dicts/nend2.dic
अंतरणे/NPR
अंधारणे/NP
अंबवणे/NP
अटकणे/NPR
अडकणे/NPQ
अडखळणे/NPQ
अडणे/NPQ
अनुभवणे/NP
अनुवादणे/NP
अपेक्षणे/NOP
अभ्यासणे/NP
अर्चणे/NOP
अर्जणे/NOP
अर्पणे/NOP
अलंकारणे/NP
अवरोधणे/NP
अवलंबणे/NP
असणे/NP
आंदोलणे/NP
आंबणे/NPQ
आंबुसणे/P
आकारणे/NP
आक्रमणे/NP
आक्षेपणे/NP
आखणे/NPQ
आचकणे/NP
आच्छादणे/NP
आटणे/NPQ
आटपणे/NP
आटोपणे/NP
आडवणे/NP
आणणे/NPQ
आणे/NP
आदळणे/NP
आपटणे/NP
आयोजणे/NP
आरणे/NPQ
आराधणे/NP
आरूढणे/NP
आलिंगणे/NP
आळवणे/NP
आळसणे/NPR
आवरणे/NP
आवर्तणे/NP
आस्वादणे/NP
इच्छणे/NOP
उकडणे/NP
उकळणे/NPQ
उकळवणे/NP
उखडणे/NPQ
उगणे/NPQ
उगाळणे/NP
उचकणे/NPQ
उचलणे/NPQ
उजळणे/NPQ
उठणे/PQ
उडणे/PQ
उतणे/PQ
उतरणे/NPQ
उत्तरणे/NP
उद्धरणे/NP
उद्धारणे/NP
उधळणे/NPQ
उनाडणे/NPQ
उन्मळणे/NP
उन्हाळणे/NP
उपजणे/NP
उपद्रवणे/NP
उपभोगणे/NP
उफाळणे/NP
उबगणे/NP
उबणे/PQ
उमगणे/NP
उमटणे/NPQ
उमलणे/NPQ
उरकणे/NPQ
उरणे/PQ
उलगडणे/NPQ
उलटणे/NPQ
उलथणे/NPQ
उल्लंघणे/NP
उसकटणे/NPQ
उसपणे/NP
एकवटणे/NP
ऐकणे/NPQ
ओढणे/NPQ
ओतणे/NP
ओरडणे/NP
ओरपणे/NP
ओलांडणे/NPQ
ओलावणे/NP
ओळखणे/NP
ओशाळणे/NP
ओसंडणे/NP
कंठणे/NP
कचकावणे/NP
कटवणे/NP
कडाडणे/NP
कथणे/NP
कमवणे/NP
करणे/NPQ
करपणे/NPQ
करवादणे/NP
कलंडणे/NPQ
कल्पणे/NOP
कळणे/NP
कळवळणे/NP
कवटाळणे/NP
कसणे/NP
कांक्षणे/NP
कांडणे/NPQ
काचणे/NP
काटणे/NP
काढणे/NPQ
कातरणे/NPQ
कापणे/NPQ
काळवटणे/NP
कावणे/NP
किंकाळणे/NPQ
किंचाळणे/NPQ
किटणे/NPQ
किडणे/NPQ
किलबिलणे/NP
किसणे/NPQ
कुंठणे/NPQ
कुंथणे/NPQ
कुचकरणे/NPQ
कुजणे/PQ
कुटणे/PQ
कुरकुरणे/P
कुरतडणे/NPQ
कुसकरणे/NPQ
केकाटणे/NPQ
कोंडणे/NPR
कोंदटणे/NP
कोंबणे/NPQ
कोकलणे/NPQ
कोपणे/NP
कोरणे/NPQ
कोलणे/NPQ
कोलमडणे/NP
कोळणे/NPQ
कोसळणे/NP
क्रोधणे/NP
क्षिणणे/NP
क्षेपणे/NP
खंडणे/NP
खंतावणे/NP
खडखडणे/NPQ
खडबडणे/NP
खणकवणे/NP
खणखणणे/NPQ
खणणे/NPQ
खदखदणे/NP
खपणे/NPQ
खरचटणे/NP
खलणे/NP
खळखळणे/NP
खवणे/NP
खाजवणे/NP
खाणे/NP
खारणे/NPQ
खाल्णे/NP
खिंकाळणे/NPQ
खिजणे/NPQ
खितपणे/NP
खिदडणे/NP
खिळणे/NPQ
खुंटणे/NPQ
खुपसणे/NP
खुरडणे/NP
खुलणे/PQ
खेचणे/NPQ
खेटणे/NPQ
खेळणे/NPQ
खोकणे/NPQ
खोचणे/NPQ
खोडणे/NPQ
खोदणे/NPQ
खोळंबणे/NPQ
खोवणे/NP
गंजणे/NP
गंडणे/NPQ
गचकणे/NPR
गटणे/NPQ
गडबडणे/NPQ
गढणे/NP
गणणे/NP
गमणे/NPQR
गरजणे/NP
गलगलणे/NP
गळणे/NP
गहिवरणे/NP
गांगरणे/NPQ
गांजणे/NP
गाजणे/NPQ
गाठणे/NPQ
गाळणे/NP
गावणे/NPQ
गिळणे/NPQ
गुंगणे/NPQ
गुंतणे/NPQ
गुंफणे/NPQ
गुदमरणे/NPQ
गुरकणे/NPR
गुरफटणे/NPQ
गोंदणे/NPQ
गोंधळणे/NPQ
गोठणे/NPQ
गोवणे/NP
गौरवणे/NP
घटणे/NPQ
घडणे/NPQ
घर्षणे/NP
घसटणे/NP
घसरणे/NPQ
घाबरणे/NPQ
घालणे/NPQ
घासणे/NPQ
घुटमळणे/NP
घुमणे/PQ
घुसमटणे/NPQ
घुसवणे/NP
घेणे/NP
घेववणे/NP
घोटणे/NPQ
घोटाळणे/NP
घोळणे/NPQ
चकणे/NP
चकमकणे/NPQ
चक्रावणे/NP
चघळणे/NP
चडफडणे/NP
चढणे/NPQ
चमकणे/NPQ
चरकणे/NP
चर्चणे/NP
चळणे/NPQ
चाखणे/NPQ
चाचपडणे/NP
चाटणे/NPQ
चारणे/NPQ
चालणे/NPQ
चाळणे/NPQ
चावणे/NPQ
चिकटणे/NPQ
चिघळणे/NPQ
चिडणे/NPQ
चितारणे/NP
चिथणे/NPQ
चिरडणे/NP
चिरणे/NPQ
चुकचुकणे/P
चुकणे/PQ
चुळबुळणे/P
चेंगरणे/NP
चेतणे/NPQ
चेष्टणे/NPQR
चोखणे/NPQ
चोखाळणे/NP
चोळणे/NPQ
चोळवटणे/NP
छपणे/NPQ
छमकणे/NPQR
छळणे/NPQ
छिडकणे/NP
छिनावणे/NP
छिलणे/NPQ
जगणे/NPQ
जडणे/NPQR
जन्मणे/NP
जपणे/NP
जमणे/NPQ
जागणे/NPQ
जाणे/NP
जाळणे/NPQ
जिरणे/NPQ
जेवणे/NPQ
जोगवणे/NP
झगडणे/NPQ
झटकणे/NPQ
झळकणे/NPQR
झाकणे/NP
झाडणे/NPQ
झिजणे/NPQ
झिडकारणे/NPQ
झिणझिणणे/NP
झुंजणे/NPQ
झुरणे/PQ
झुलणे/PQ
झेपणे/NPR
झेलणे/NPQ
झोडणे/NPQ
झोडपणे/NPQ
झोपणे/NPQ
टरकणे/NPQR
टरारणे/NP
टवकारणे/NP
टिकणे/NPQ
टिचणे/NP
टेकणे/NPQ
टोकरणे/NPQ
ठकणे/NPQ
ठणकणे/NPR
ठरणे/NPQ
ठसणे/NPQ
ठुमकणे/NP
ठेचकळणे/NP
ठोकणे/NPQ
ठोकरणे/NP
ठोठावणे/NPQ
डरणे/NPQ
डळमळणे/NPQ
डसणे/NPQ
डाचणे/NP
डाफरणे/NPQ
डुंबणे/NPQ
डुलणे/PQ
डोकावणे/NPQ
डोलणे/NPQ
ढवळणे/NPQ
ढाळणे/NPQ
ढासळणे/NPQ
तंगडणे/NPQ
तंतरणे/NP
तडकणे/NPR
तडतडणे/NP
तणतणणे/NP
तरंगणे/NPQ
तरसणे/NP
तर्कणे/NP
तळतळणे/NPR
तहानणे/NP
तांबरणे/NP
ताटकळणे/NPQ
ताणणे/NPQ
तारणे/NP
तासणे/NPQ
तिरमिरणे/NP
तिष्ठणे/NPQ
तुंबणे/NPQ
तुष्टणे/NP
तोडणे/NPQ
तोषणे/NPQ
त्यजणे/NOP
थंडावणे/NP
थबथबणे/NP
थरकावणे/NP
थांबणे/NPQ
थापटणे/NPQ
थापडणे/NPQ
थिजणे/NPQ
थुंकणे/NPQ
थोपणे/NPQ
थोबाडणे/NP
दंडणे/NP
दचकणे/NPQ
दडवणे/NP
दणकणे/NPR
दणदणणे/NP
दरडावणे/NP
दरवळणे/NP
दळणे/NPQ
दाबणे/NPQ
दामटणे/NPQ
दिणे/FP
दिपणे/NPR
दुखणे/NPQR
दुमडणे/NP
दुमदुमणे/P
दोषणे/NP
दौडणे/NPQ
धजणे/NPR
धडधडणे/NP
धरणे/NPQ
धापणे/NP
धावणे/NPQ
धुगधुगणे/P
धुडकणे/FQR
धुपणे/PQ
धुरकटणे/NP
ध्वंसणे/NP
नडणे/NPQ
नरमणे/NPQ
नांगरणे/NPQ
नांदणे/NPQ
नाणावणे/NP
नावडणे/NP
नासणे/NPQ
निक्षेपणे/NP
निघणे/NP
निथळणे/NP
निपजणे/NP
निरखणे/NP
निरूपणे/NP
निर्मिणे/NP
निवणे/NPQ
निस्तरणे/NPQ
नेमणे/NP
नेसणे/NPQ
न्हाववणे/NP
पकडणे/NPQ
पखरणे/NP
पटकवणे/NPR
पटणे/NPQ
पडणे/NP
पढणे/NPQ
परतणे/NPQR
परिमळणे/NP
परिहारणे/NP
पसरणे/NPQ
पांगणे/NPQ
पांघरणे/NP
पाजणे/NPQ
पाझरणे/NP
पाठवणे/NP
पादणे/NPQ
पारखणे/NP
पालटणे/NPQ
पाहणे/NOPQ
पिंजणे/NPQ
पिंजरणे/NP
पिकणे/NPQ
पिटणे/NPQ
पिटाळणे/NP
पिडणे/NPQ
पिळणे/NPQ
पिसाटणे/NP
पुरणे/PQ
पुरस्करणे/NP
पेटणे/NPQ
पेरणे/NP
पेहेरणे/NP
पोचणे/NPQ
पोहणे/NPQ
प्रकटणे/NP
प्रवेशणे/NP
प्रार्थणे/NP
फटकणे/NPQR
फडकणे/NPQR
फडफडणे/NPQ
फणफणणे/NP
फरफटणे/NPQ
फळणे/NP
फसणे/NPQ
फाकणे/NPQ
फासणे/NP
फितणे/NPQ
फिसकटणे/NPQ
फुंकणे/NP
फुकणे/P
फुलणे/PQ
फुशारणे/NP
फेकणे/NP
फेसाळणे/NP
बघणे/NPQ
बजावणे/NP
बदडणे/NPQ
बदलणे/NPQ
बनणे/NPQ
बरबटणे/NPQ
बसणे/NPQ
बहकणे/NPR
बागडणे/NP
बाचकणे/NPQ
बाणणे/NPQ
बारगळणे/NP
बावचळणे/NP
बिंबणे/NPQ
बिचकणे/NPQ
बिथरणे/NPQ
बिनसणे/NPQ
बुकलणे/NP
बुडणे/PQ
बुरसणे/NPR
बेतणे/NP
बोलणे/NPQR
बोळवणे/NP
भंगणे/NP
भडकणे/NPQR
भडभडणे/NP
भणभणणे/NP
भरारणे/NP
भलावणे/NP
भागणे/NPQ
भादरणे/NP
भारणे/NPR
भासणे/NPQ
भिडणे/NPQ
भिरकणे/NPQR
भुलणे/PQ
भूषवणे/NP
भेटणे/NPQ
भेलकंडणे/NP
भोगणे/NPQ
भोसकणे/NPQ
मंतरणे/NP
मटकणे/NPR
मढणे/NPQ
मळकटणे/NP
मळणे/NPQ
महागणे/NP
माखणे/NPQ
मागसणे/NPR
माजणे/NPQ
माणसाळणे/NP
मारणे/NPQ
मिंधणे/NP
मिचकणे/NPQR
मिणमिणणे/NP
मिळणे/NPQ
मिसळणे/NP
मुतणे/PQ
मेणे/FP
मोजणे/NP
मोडणे/NPQ
म्हणणे/NPQ
येणे/NP
योजणे/NP
रंजणे/NPQ
रखडणे/NPQ
रगडणे/NPQ
रचणे/NPQ
रडणे/NPQ
रांगणे/NPQ
राखणे/NPQ
रागणे/FQR
राबणे/NPQ
राहणे/NOPQ
रिचणे/FQ
रुचणे/P
रुजणे/PQ
रुसणे/PQ
रेकणे/NPQ
रेखाटणे/NP
रोखणे/NPQ
रोरावणे/NP
लंगडणे/NPQ
लगबगणे/NP
लचकणे/NP
लडबडणे/NPQ
लपणे/NPQ
लपेटणे/NP
लवंडणे/NP
लांबणे/NPQ
लाजणे/NPQ
लाथाडणे/NPQ
लादणे/NP
लालचावणे/NP
लावणे/NPQ
लिहणे/NOPQ
लुटणे/PQ
लुडकणे/NP
लुबाडणे/NPQ
लेणे/P
लोंबकळणे/NPQ
लोंबणे/NP
लोपणे/NPQ
लोभणे/NP
वगळणे/NP
वटवणे/NP
वठणे/NPQ
वधणे/NP
वर्णणे/NP
वर्तणे/NPQ
वळणे/NPQ
वसणे/NPQ
वाकणे/NPQ
वागणे/NPQ
वाजणे/NPQ
वाढणे/NPQ
वाफणे/NPQ
वासणे/NP
वाहणे/NPQ
विकणे/NPQ
विकसणे/NP
विखुरणे/P
विटंबणे/NP
विणणे/NPQ
विभागणे/NP
विरघळणे/NPQ
विरचणे/NP
विलसणे/NP
विवंचणे/NP
विसरणे/NP
विसावणे/NP
विस्कटणे/NPQ
वेंगाडणे/NP
वेडावणे/NP
व्यभिचरणे/NP
व्याकुळणे/P
शमणे/NPQ
शापणे/NP
शिजणे/NPQ
शिरणे/NPQ
शिवशिवणे/NP
शोषणे/NP
श्रमणे/NPQ
संकल्पणे/NOP
संग्रहणे/NP
संपणे/NPQ
संभोगणे/NPQ
संस्कारणे/NP
सटकणे/NPQ
सणकणे/NPQ
सणसणणे/NP
समजणे/NPQR
समर्थणे/NP
सरकणे/NPQ
सरावणे/NP
सांगणे/NPQ
सांडणे/NPQ
साचणे/NPQ
साजणे/NP
सादणे/NPQ
साहणे/NP
सुजणे/P
सुलटणे/NPQ
सुस्कारणे/NP
सोडणे/NP
सोलणे/NPQ
सोसणे/NPQ
स्थिरावणे/NP
स्फुंदणे/NP
हगणे/NPQ
हडकणे/NP
हबकणे/NP
हरणे/NP
हसणे/NPQ
हाकलणे/NPQ
हाणणे/NPQ
हादडणे/NPQ
हालणे/NPQ
हिसकणे/NPR
हुंकारणे/NPQ
हुंदडणे/NPQ
हुसकणे/NPR
हेटाळणे/NP
अडकवणे/NP
अडखळवणे/NP
उकळवणे/NP
उखडवणे/NP
उतवणे/NP
उतरवणे/NP
उरवणे/NP
उलगडवणे/NP
करवणे/NP
करपवणे/NP
किंचाळवणे/NP
किटवणे/NP
कुटवणे/NP
कुरतडवणे/NP
कोळवणे/NP
खडखडवणे/NP
खिळवणे/NP
खुंटवणे/NP
खोडवणे/NP
खोदवणे/NP
गमवणे/NPR
गाजवणे/NP
गाठवणे/NP
गुरफटवणे/NP
गोंदवणे/NP
घालवणे/NP
घासवणे/NP
चमकवणे/NP
चळवणे/NP
चिकटवणे/NP
चिघळवणे/NP
चेष्टवणे/NPR
चोखवणे/NP
चोळवणे/NP
छमकवणे/NPR
जगवणे/NP
जडवणे/NPR
जिरवणे/NP
जुळवणे/NP
झळकवणे/NPR
झाडवणे/NP
झिजवणे/NP
झेलवणे/NP
झोडवणे/NP
टरकवणे/NPR
टोकरवणे/NP
टोचवणे/NP
डरवणे/NP
डळमळवणे/NP
डुलवणे/NP
डोकाववणे/NP
तंगडवणे/NP
तंगवणे/NP
तासवणे/NP
तिष्ठवणे/NP
थांबवणे/NP
थापटवणे/NP
दचकवणे/NP
दमवणे/NP
दुखवणे/NPR
धरवणे/NP
धावडवणे/NP
धुडकवणे/FQR
नांगरवणे/NP
नांदवणे/NP
नोंदवणे/NP
पकडवणे/NP
परतवणे/NPR
पांगवणे/NP
पाजवणे/NP
पाहवणे/NONP
पिंजवणे/NP
पुसवणे/NP
फटकवणे/NPR
फडकवणे/NPR
फरपटवणे/NP
फुगवणे/NP
बांधवणे/NP
बिथरवणे/NP
बोलवणे/NPR
भडकवणे/NPR
भांडवणे/NP
भिरकवणे/NPR
भुरकवणे/NP
मरवणे/NP
माववणे/NP
मिचकवणे/NPR
मोहवणे/NP
रमवणे/NP
रागवणे/FQR
राहवणे/NONP
रिचवणे/FQ
रुजवणे/NP
रुतवणे/NP
लंगडवणे/NP
लटकवणे/NP
लाथाडवणे/NP
लाथाळवणे/NP
लिहवणे/NONP
लोटवणे/NP
लोळवणे/NP
वाकवणे/NP
वाचवणे/NP
वाळवणे/NP
विंचरवणे/NP
विसकटवणे/NP
वेचवणे/NP
शेकवणे/NP
संतापवणे/NP
सडवणे/NP
समजवणे/NPR
साठवणे/NP
सारवणे/NP
हदरवणे/NP
हाकलवणे/NP
हिंडवणे/NP
हुंगवणे/NP
कोंडावणे/NP
गमावणे/NP
झेपावणे/NP
ठणकावणे/NP
धजावणे/NP
पटकवावणे/NP
बोलावणे/NP
भारावणे/NP
समजावणे/NP
हुसकावणे/NP
